District of Columbia statutes.
38-2301

Appropriation for indigent blind children.

The indefinite appropriation to pay for the instruction of the indigent blind children of the District of Columbia, formerly instructed in Gallaudet University shall be paid out of the revenues of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 3, 1899, 30 Stat. 1101, ch. 424, § 1
Mar. 4, 1911, 36 Stat. 1422, ch. 285, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-1801.
1973 Ed., § 31-1020.
“Gallaudet University” was substituted for “Gallaudet College” pursuant to § 38-2401.01. “Gallaudet College” had previously been substituted for “Columbia Institution for the Deaf” pursuant to former § 38-2305.